Mississippi, session 2026, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the Teaching Honesty, Respect, Integrity, Virtue and Excellence (T.H.R.I.V.E.) Act. SECTION 2. (1)  (a)  Not later than the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year, the State Department of Education shall require developmentally appropriate success sequence and character education courses to be taught in all public elementary and secondary schools of this state. (b)  Not later than June 30, 2026, the department shall approve a list of courses and instructional materials that strictly comply with the requirements of this section.  The approved course and instructional materials list shall not include any programs, curricula or materials that contradict or undermine respect for the character traits and personal skills required to be taught pursuant to this section.  The department's approval of courses and instructional materials pursuant to this section is ministerial only and not discretionary.  Districts and schools may only satisfy the requirements of this section by adopting courses from this approved list. (2)  Courses taught pursuant to this section shall: (a)  Teach the value of finishing high school, working full-time, getting married before having children. (b)  Teach only the following character traits and fundamental values deeply rooted in the history and tradition of the United States, particularly the State of Mississippi: (i) Trustworthiness, including honesty, reliability, punctuality and loyalty; (ii) Responsibility, including hard work, accountability, diligence, good judgment, perseverance and self-control; (iii)  Care for family, including parents, siblings and future spouses and children; (iv)  Kindness and generosity toward others; (v)  Respect and care for human life; (vi)  Respect for parental authority; (vii)  Respect for parents' obligations to children; (viii)  Respect for the property of other people; (ix)  Respect for legitimate authority and law; (x)  Respect for patriotism, service to the community and concern for the common good; (xi)  Respect for religious faith, morality, wisdom and knowledge; (xii)  Respect for lifelong marriage, sexual fidelity within marriage and sexual abstinence outside of marriage; (xiii)  Gratitude, charity and courage. (3)  Each school board shall adopt a process to issue a public notice of the adoption of the success sequence and character education curriculum required under this act, to make course materials available for public inspection, and to provide parents a means to opt their child out of participation in the courses.  Participation in the success sequence and character education courses of instruction required hereunder may be terminated by the student's parent or legal guardian at any time upon written notice to the board.  No student whose parent or legal guardian elects to opt out shall be required to participate in the success sequence and character education courses of instruction established under this section. SECTION 3. (1)  No later than sixty (60) days following the beginning of each school year beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, and annually thereafter, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and chairpersons of the Education Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives, a report stating, as of the reporting date: (a)  The total number of public school districts; (b)  The total number and names of schools and districts that have adopted success sequence and character education courses in compliance with the requirements of this section; (c)  The total number and names of districts not in compliance; and (d)  Actions taken by the department to bring noncompliant districts into compliance. The report shall be made available to the public in a clearly accessible manner on the department's website. (2)  The department, districts and schools may accept federal or private funds for the purpose of assisting with implementation of success sequence and character education courses in compliance with the requirements of this section. (3)  (a)  Not later than the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year, each local school board shall adopt a policy to make the school premises available for voluntary participation by students, with consent of the student's parent or legal guardian, in after-school instruction programs provided by third parties that instruct pupils in the philosophical, historical, traditional or religious justifications for the success sequence and character education curriculum established under Section 2 of this act. (b)  The department shall make a list of approved after-school programs available to districts, schools and parents and shall adopt a process, in cooperation with third-party providers, to obtain the consent of the student and the student's parent or legal guardian for the student's participation.  Consent for a student's participation in the program may be revoked at any time by the student, parent or legal guardian upon written notice to the school or board. (4)  The purpose of the after-school instruction program is to provide philosophical, historical, traditional or religious justifications for the success sequence and character traits set forth in Section 2 of this act.  No after-school instruction program that is inconsistent with that purpose or subject matter may be approved. Subject to this requirement of purpose and subject-matter consistency, the board may not deny approval to any after-school program based on its viewpoint or on the grounds that it contains expression protected by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution or Article 3, Section 18 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890. (5)  The State Department of Education may adopt rules as necessary to implement this act. SECTION 4.  Section 1 through 3 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 13, Title 37, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  (1)  In the event of a conflict between the requirements of this act and any other state statute, administrative code, regulation, guidance or policy, the requirements of this act shall control. (2)  If any one or more provisions, subsections or sections, of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional, the same is hereby declared to be severable and the balance of this act shall remain effective notwithstanding such unconstitutionality.  The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provisions, sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases or words be declared unconstitutional. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.